North Dakota, session 69, HB1059.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 9 of section 12.1-32-02 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
9. A person who is convicted of a felony and sentenced to imprisonment for not more
than three hundred sixty days is deemed to have been convicted of a class A
misdemeanor and subject to class A misdemeanor penalties under this chapte r.
However, if an order is entered revoking a term of probation that was imposed as part
of a sentence, the person is deemed to have been convicted of a felony.
Page No. 1 25.8054.01000